District of Columbia statutes.
2-327.01

Repealed

Creation of Chief Information Officer position; duties.

Repealed.

Jan. 26, 1996, D.C. Law 11-78, § 1001, 42 DCR 6181
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 801, 43 DCR 5
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 502, 45 DCR 7193
1981 Ed., § 1-1182.9.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 302 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 302 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of section, see § 302 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).